dictsource/tk_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Turkmen language

// Letter groups
.L01 a aa y yy
.L02 o oo u uu
.L03 ä ää e ee i ii
.L04 ö öö ü
.C b ç d f g h j k l m n ň p r s ş t w ý z ž

.replace
// Replace non-standard letters
    ñ    ň
    ÿ    ý

.group a
    a    A
    aa	A:
    oC) aa	A:
    oCC) aa	A:
    oCaC) aa	A:
    uC) aa	A:
    uCC) aa	A:
    a (w    o
    _garl) a (waç_	a
    awl) a	o
    awlam) a	o
    L02C) a    o
    L02CCaC) a	o
    L02CL01CC) a	o
    L02CC) a    o
    L02CaC) a    o
    L02CaCC) a    o
    oCCaCC) a	o
    oCCaCyC) a	o
    oCaCyCC) a	o
    L02CL01CL01C) a (_	o
    L02CCL01CC) a (_	o
    C) abermek (_	a:BeRmek
    L02C) amok (_	a:mo:q
    L02C) aňok (_	a:No:q
    L02C) anok (_	a:no:q
    L02C) amzok (_	a:mDo:q
    L02C) aňzok (_	a:NDo:q
    L02C) anoklar (_	a:no:qlor
    L02C) ap (_	o:p

.group ä
    ä    &
    ää	&:
    äp (_	&:p
    C) ämok (_	&:mo:q
    C) äbermek (_	&:BeRmek

.group b
    b     b
    @m_) b	m
    L01) b	B
    L01_) b	B
    L02) b	B
    L02_) b	B
    L03) b B
    L03_) b	B
    L04) b	B
    L04_) b	B
    C) b	B
    C_) b	B
    m) b    m
    m_) b    m
    n) b    m
    n_) b    m
    ň) b    m
    ň_) b    m
    w_) b    B
    @) baz (_	BA:D
    @) bermek (_	BeRmek

.group ç
    ç    tS
    ç (_ş    S

.group d
    d    d
    k_) d	g    
    k_) d (äl_    g    
    k_) d (ääl_    g    
    L01l) d    L
    L02l) d    L
    L03l) d    l
    L04l) d    l
    L01l_) d    L
    L02l_) d    L
    L03l_) d    l
    L04l_) d    l
    m) d   n
    n) d   n
    n_) d   n
    ň) d   N
    ň_) d   N
    s) d   T
    s_) d   T
    s_) d (äl_	T
    s_) d (ääl_	T
    z) d   D
    z_) d   D
    L02CL02) da	d'o
    L02CL02) dan	d'on
    uCyCyn) dan	n'on
    öCL03CL03C) den (_	d'Wn
    @) daky (_	dA:q@
    @) däki (_	d&:kI
    @) dar (_	dA:R
    
.group e
    e    e
    ee	e:
    e (w    W
    ewl) e	W
    ewlem) e	W
    L04C) e    W
    L04CC) e    W
    L04CCL03C) e	W
    L04CCL04C) e	W
    L04CL03C) e    W
    L04CCC) e    W
    L04CL03CC) e    W
    L04CCCeCC) e   W
    L04CL04CCiC) e	W
    L04CL04CCiCeC) e	W
    L04CCeCL03C) e	W
    L03C) emok (_	emo:q
    L04C) emok (_	Wmo:q
    _düý) e (_    W
    öCCeCCiC) e	W
    üCeCCCiCC) e	W
    üCeCiC) e	W
    öCCeCC) e	W
    L04CL03CL03CC) e (n_	W

.group f
    f    f,

.group g
    g    g
    g (L01     Q"
    g (L02     Q"
    L01) g (L01     Q"
    L02) g (L02     Q"
    L03) g (L03     Q"
    L04) g (L04     Q"
    ň) g    N
    ň_) g    N
    _) g (L01     g
    _) g (L02     g
    _) g (L03     g
    _) g (L04     g
    L01) g (_     Q"
    L02) g (_     Q"
    L03) g (_     Q"
    L04) g (_     Q"
    C) g    Q"
    g (C	Q"
    @) gär (_	g&:R

.group h
    h    h
    h (L01     x
    h (L02     x
    h (L03     h
    h (L04     h
    L01) h     x
    L02) h     x
    L03) h     h
    L04) h     h
    @) hana (_	xA:nA

.group i
    i    i
    ii	i:
    öC) ii	Y:
    üC) ii	Y:
    öCC) ii	Y:
    üCC) ii	Y:
    L04C) i    Y
    L04Cs) i (z_	Y
    L04CC) i    Y
    L04CCL04ň) i    Y
    L04CL04CC) i	Y
    L04CCL03C) i	Y
    L04CCL04CC) i	Y
    L04CL04CCiC) i	Y
    L04CCL03CC) i	Y
    öCeC) i	Y
    üCeC) i	Y
    üCCC) i	Y
    üCiCCeC) i	Y
    öCeCC) i	Y
    üCeCC) i	Y
    üCiC) i	Y
    öCeCCiC) i	Y
    üCeCCC) i	Y
    öCCeCeC) i	Y
    üCCCeC) i	Y
    öCCeCCeCC) i	Y
    öCCeCCiC) i	Y
    öCeCeC) i	Y
    üCCCeCC) i	Y
    üCCeCiC) i	Y
    öCCeCiC) i	Y
    öCCeCiCiCC) i	Y

.group j
    j    dZ
    ş) j    S
    ş_) j    S
    @) jagaz (_	dZAQ"AD
    oC) jak	dZ'oq
    öCCeC) jek	dZ'Wk

.group k
    k    k
    k (L01     q
    k (L02     q
    k (L03     k
    k (L04     k
    L01) k     q
    L02) k     q
    L03) k     k
    L04) k     k
    @) keş (_	keS

.group l
    l    l
    l (L01     L
    l (L02     L
    l (L03     l
    l (L04     l
    L01) l     L
    L02) l     L
    L03) l     l
    L04) l     l
    lap (_	lA:p
    läp (_	l&:p
    oCCL01n) lar (_ loR
    o) lar (_ loR
    ö) ler (_ lWR
    öCCL03k) ler (_ lWR
    öCe) ler	lWR

.group m
    m    m
    mak (_	m'Aq
    mek (_	m'ek
    L02C) mak (_	m'oq
    L04C) mek (_	m'Wk 
    L02CL01) mak (_	m'oq
    oCCa) mak (_	m'oq
    oCCaC) mak (_	m'oq
    oCaC) mak (_	m'oq
    oCCCaC) mak (_	m'oq
    oCaCCaC) mak (_	m'oq
    uCaC) mak (_	m'oq
    uCCCaC) mak (_	m'oq
    uCaCCaC) mak (_	m'oq
    uCCa) mak (_	m'oq
    uCCyC) mak (_ m'oq
    uCCaC) mak (_	m'oq
    öCCe) mek (_	m'Wk
    öCCeC) mek (_	m'Wk
    öCCCeC) mek (_	m'Wk
    öCeC) mek (_	m'Wk
    öCeCCeC) mek (_	m'Wk
    üCCe) mek (_	m'Wk
    üCCCeC) mek (_	m'Wk
    üCeCCeC) mek (_	m'Wk
    üCCeC) mek (_	m'Wk
    üCeC) mek (_	m'Wk
    L04CL03) mek (_	m'Wk 
    L02C) mamak (_	momoq
    L04C) memek (_	mWmWk
    L01C) mazlyk (_	maDL'@q
    L02C) mazlyk (_	moDL'Uq
    L03C) mezlik (_	meDl'ik
    L04C) mezlik (_	mWDl'Yk
    @) mäge (_	m&:ge
    aw) my (_	mU
    ew) mi (_	mY
    otyrsyň) my (_	mU
    örsüň) mi	(_	mY
    öCCeCCiC) mi	(_	mY
    L02C) masammy (_	moTommU
    L04C) mesemmi (_	mWTWmmY
    mb	mm
    md    mn

.group n
    n    n
    nb    nm
    @) nama (_	nA:mA
    
.group ň
    ň   N
    ňb    Nm
    ňg    N:

.group o
    o    o
    oo	o:
    
.group ö
    ö     W
    öö	W:

.group p
    p    p
    L01) p (_g    q
    L02) p (_g    q
    L03) p (_g    k
    L04) p (_g    k

.group r
    r    R
    @) rak (_	RA:q
    @) räk (_	R&:k

.group s
    s    T
    
.group ş
    ş    S
    şç    S:

.group t
    t    t
    t (ç    tS
    t (s    T
    s) t    T

.group u
    u    U
    uu	U:
    
.group ü
    ü    Y
    üý    Y:j
    üýe    YjW

.group w
    w    B

.group y
    y    @
    yy	@:
    uC) yy	@:
    uCaşd) yy (r	@:
    us) y (z	U
    L02C) y	U
    L02CC) y	U
    L02CL01C) y	U
    L02CCL01C) y	U
    L02CL02C) y	U
    L02CL01CC) y	U
    L02CCL02C) y	U
    L02ňL01CC) y	U
    L02CCL02CC) y	U
    L02CCL01CC) y	U
    L02CCL01CyC) y	U
    oCCaCCaC) y	U
    uCCC)	y	U
    uCaCCaCC) y	U
    uCyCCyCC) y	U
    oCaCaCC) y	U
    oCCaCaCC) y	U
    o@mazd) ym	Um
    oCaCyC) y	U
    uCaCCyCC) y	U
    
.group ý
    ý    j
    @) ýär (_	j&:R
    @) ýärin (_	j&:Rin
    @) ýäris (_	j&:RiT
    @) ýärsiň (_	j&:RTiN
    @) ýärsiňiz (_	j&:RTiNiD
    

.group z
    z    D
    z (s    T
    @) zar (_	DA:R

.group ž
    ž     Z
